Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIV Libraries And Archives
Commonwealth of Kentucky War of 1812 Bicentennial Commission

171.755.
Kentucky War of 1812 Bicentennial Commission. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 68, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 69, § 10, effective June 24, 2015; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.

171.757.
Commission’s powers. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 68, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; repealed by 2017 ch. 80, § 58, effective June 29, 2017.